Massachusetts, session 194th, H5018.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
thereof the following new section:-
Section 35. The commission shall provide to any active or retired employee of the
commonwealth who is insured under the group insurance commission coverage and
reimbursement on par with in-person services for the cost of hospital at home services provided
by an acute care hospital participating in the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Acute
Hospital Care at Home Program.
SECTION 2. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
thereof the following new section:-
Section 231. An individual policy of accident and sickness insurance issued under section
108 that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and any group blanket or
general policy of accident and sickness insurance issued under section 110 that provides hospital
expense and surgical expense insurance, which is issued or renewed within or without the
of 3

commonwealth, shall provide coverage and reimbursement on par with in-person services for the
cost of hospital at home services provided by an acute care hospital participating in the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services Acute Hospital Care at Home Program.
SECTION 3. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the
end thereof the following new section:-
Section 39. A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or
group hospital service plan which provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance,
except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs,
delivered, issued or renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or
without the commonwealth, shall provide coverage and reimbursement on par with in-person
services for the cost of hospital at home services provided by an acute care hospital participating
in the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Acute Hospital Care at Home Program.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the
end thereof the following new section:-
Section 26. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement, except certificates which provide supplemental coverage to medicare or other
governmental programs, which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in the
commonwealth, shall provide coverage and reimbursement on par with in-person services for the
cost of hospital at home services provided by an acute care hospital participating in the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services Acute Hospital Care at Home Program.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the
end thereof the following new section:-
of 3

Section 34. Individual and group health maintenance contracts shall provide coverage and
reimbursement on par with on-person services for the cost of hospital at home services provided
by an acute care hospital participating in the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Acute
Hospital Care at Home Program.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176I of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
thereof the following new section:-
Section 14. An organization entering into a preferred provider contract shall provide
coverage and reimbursement for the cost of hospital at home services provided by an acute care
hospital participating in the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Acute Hospital Care at
Home Program.
of 3